dictionaries/cy_GB.aff
SFX A Y 385
SFX A   u           om         u
SFX A   u           och        u
SFX A   u           ont        u
SFX A   u           er         u
SFX A   u           es         u
SFX A   u           est        u
SFX A   u           ith        u
SFX A   u           iff        u
SFX A   u           on         u
SFX A   u           an         u
SFX A   u           af         u
SFX A   u           i          u
SFX A   u           a          u
SFX A   u           a'i        u
SFX A   u           a'u        u
SFX A   u           a'ch       u
SFX A   u           a'n        u
SFX A   u           a'r        u
SFX A   u           wn         u
SFX A   u           wch        u
SFX A   u           ant        u
SFX A   u           ir         u
SFX A   u           it         u
SFX A   u           et         u
SFX A   u           ai         u
SFX A   u           ai'i       u
SFX A   u           ai'u       u
SFX A   u           ai'ch      u
SFX A   u           ai'n       u
SFX A   u           ai'r       u
SFX A   u           em         u
SFX A   u           ent        u
SFX A   u           ech        u
SFX A   u           id         u
SFX A   u           ais        u
SFX A   u           aist       u
SFX A   u           odd        u
SFX A   u           asom       u
SFX A   u           asoch      u
SFX A   u           asant      u
SFX A   u           wyd        u
SFX A   u           aswn       u
SFX A   u           asit       u
SFX A   u           aset       u
SFX A   u           asai       u
SFX A   u           asai'i     u
SFX A   u           asai'u     u
SFX A   u           asai'ch    u
SFX A   u           asai'n     u
SFX A   u           asai'r     u
SFX A   u           asem       u
SFX A   u           asech      u
SFX A   u           asent      u
SFX A   u           asid       u
SFX A   u           ed         u
SFX A   u           wyf        u
SFX A   u           ych        u
SFX A   u           o          u
SFX A   u           o'i        u
SFX A   u           o'u        u
SFX A   u           o'ch       u
SFX A   u           o'n        u
SFX A   u           o'r        u
SFX A   i           om         i
SFX A   i           och        i
SFX A   i           ont        i
SFX A   i           er         i
SFX A   i           es         i
SFX A   i           est        i
SFX A   i           ith        i
SFX A   i           iff        i
SFX A   i           on         i
SFX A   i           an         i
SFX A   i           af         i
SFX A   i           a          i
SFX A   i           a'i        i
SFX A   i           a'u        i
SFX A   i           a'ch       i
SFX A   i           a'n        i
SFX A   i           a'r        i
SFX A   i           wn         i
SFX A   i           wch        i
SFX A   i           ant        i
SFX A   i           ir         i
SFX A   i           it         i
SFX A   i           et         i
SFX A   i           ai         i
SFX A   i           ai'i       i
SFX A   i           ai'u       i
SFX A   i           ai'ch      i
SFX A   i           ai'n       i
SFX A   i           ai'r       i
SFX A   i           em         i
SFX A   i           ent        i
SFX A   i           ech        i
SFX A   i           id         i
SFX A   i           ais        i
SFX A   i           aist       i
SFX A   i           odd        i
SFX A   i           asom       i
SFX A   i           asoch      i
SFX A   i           asant      i
SFX A   i           wyd        i
SFX A   i           aswn       i
SFX A   i           asit       i
SFX A   i           aset       i
SFX A   i           asai       i
SFX A   i           asai'i     i
SFX A   i           asai'u     i
SFX A   i           asai'ch    i
SFX A   i           asai'n     i
SFX A   i           asai'r     i
SFX A   i           asem       i
SFX A   i           asech      i
SFX A   i           asent      i
SFX A   i           asid       i
SFX A   i           ed         i
SFX A   i           wyf        i
SFX A   i           ych        i
SFX A   i           o          i
SFX A   i           o'i        i
SFX A   i           o'u        i
SFX A   i           o'ch       i
SFX A   i           o'n        i
SFX A   i           o'r        i
SFX A   o           om         o
SFX A   o           och        o
SFX A   o           ont        o
SFX A   o           er         o
SFX A   o           es         o
SFX A   o           est        o
SFX A   o           ith        o
SFX A   o           iff        o
SFX A   o           on         o
SFX A   o           an         o
SFX A   o           af         o
SFX A   o           i          o
SFX A   o           i'i        o
SFX A   o           i'u        o
SFX A   o           i'ch       o
SFX A   o           i'n        o
SFX A   o           i'r        o
SFX A   o           a          o
SFX A   o           a'i        o
SFX A   o           a'u        o
SFX A   o           a'ch       o
SFX A   o           a'n        o
SFX A   o           a'r        o
SFX A   o           wn         o
SFX A   o           wch        o
SFX A   o           ant        o
SFX A   o           ir         o
SFX A   o           it         o
SFX A   o           et         o
SFX A   o           ai         o
SFX A   o           ai'i       o
SFX A   o           ai'u       o
SFX A   o           ai'ch      o
SFX A   o           ai'n       o
SFX A   o           ai'r       o
SFX A   o           em         o
SFX A   o           ent        o
SFX A   o           ech        o
SFX A   o           id         o
SFX A   o           ais        o
SFX A   o           aist       o
SFX A   o           odd        o
SFX A   o           asom       o
SFX A   o           asoch      o
SFX A   o           asant      o
SFX A   o           wyd        o
SFX A   o           aswn       o
SFX A   o           asit       o
SFX A   o           aset       o
SFX A   o           asai       o
SFX A   o           asai'i     o
SFX A   o           asai'u     o
SFX A   o           asai'ch    o
SFX A   o           asai'n     o
SFX A   o           asai'r     o
SFX A   o           asem       o
SFX A   o           asech      o
SFX A   o           asent      o
SFX A   o           asid       o
SFX A   o           ed         o
SFX A   o           wyf        o
SFX A   o           ych        o
SFX A   a           om         a
SFX A   a           och        a
SFX A   a           ont        a
SFX A   a           er         a
SFX A   a           es         a
SFX A   a           est        a
SFX A   a           ith        a
SFX A   a           iff        a
SFX A   a           on         a
SFX A   a           an         a
SFX A   a           af         a
SFX A   a           i          a
SFX A   a           i'i        a
SFX A   a           i'u        a
SFX A   a           i'ch       a
SFX A   a           i'n        a
SFX A   a           i'r        a
SFX A   a           wn         a
SFX A   a           wch        a
SFX A   a           ant        a
SFX A   a           ir         a
SFX A   a           it         a
SFX A   a           et         a
SFX A   a           ai         a
SFX A   a           ai'i       a
SFX A   a           ai'u       a
SFX A   a           ai'ch      a
SFX A   a           ai'n       a
SFX A   a           ai'r       a
SFX A   a           em         a
SFX A   a           ent        a
SFX A   a           ech        a
SFX A   a           id         a
SFX A   a           ais        a
SFX A   a           aist       a
SFX A   a           odd        a
SFX A   a           asom       a
SFX A   a           asoch      a
SFX A   a           asant      a
SFX A   a           wyd        a
SFX A   a           aswn       a
SFX A   a           asit       a
SFX A   a           aset       a
SFX A   a           asai       a
SFX A   a           asai'i     a
SFX A   a           asai'u     a
SFX A   a           asai'ch    a
SFX A   a           asai'n     a
SFX A   a           asai'r     a
SFX A   a           asem       a
SFX A   a           asech      a
SFX A   a           asent      a
SFX A   a           asid       a
SFX A   a           ed         a
SFX A   a           wyf        a
