dictionaries/cy_GB.dic
disbyddu/ANQ
lucheda/ANQ
cwata/ALNQ
dilorna/ANQ
dianghenu/ANQ
frasgamu/ANQ
gorganu/ANQ
feda/ANQ
byddaru/ANQ
bythola/ANQ
ddiadellu/ANQ
cecru/ALNQ
ffasna/ANQ
diasgellu/ANQ
ymgyfoethoga/ANQ
hymfflamychu/ANQ
cochi/ALN
gwynfana/ANQ
ddelfryda/ANQ
brecha/ANQ
newynu/ANQ
bersawra/ANQ
wasgara/AMNQ
cydlyna/ALNQ
ochrgamu/ANQ
llefa/ANQ
syrffedu/ANQ
ymddatoda/ANQ
ymatala/ANQ
anllada/ANPQ
lanastra/ANQ
darboda/ANQ
blaendorri/ACNQ
werthyd/AR
atyfa/ANPQ
pryna/ALNQ
edfryda/ANQ
prygowtha/ALNQ
cythru/ALNQ
feddalu/ANQ
gliciedu/ANQ
rhyngwyneba/ANQ
ddallu/ANQ
drosa/ANQ
hamlygu/ANQ
guru/AN
frocha/ANQ
bysu/ANQ
syflyd/A
cynyddu/ALNQ
blastra/ANQ
plisga/ALNQ
ddirmyga/ANQ
engrafa/ANQ
golla/ANQ
haildargedu/ANQ
aildargedu/ANQ
ymbrioda/ANQ
chwenycha/ANQ
brasbwytha/ANQ
oera/ANQ
ymddiswydda/ANQ
rethregu/ANQ
hymrysona/ANQ
ubaina/ANQ
dadwaddola/ANQ
hymdebygu/ANQ
haddasu/ANQ
ysglyfaethu/ANQ
ddiffyna/ANQ
ddisbydda/ANQ
arfarnu/ANQ
gloffrwyma/ANQ
liniaru/ANQ
saca/ANQ
ddigarega/ANQ
ddibobloga/ANQ
glaswena/ANQ
gwestiyna/ANQ
bensyfrdana/ANQ
ddyrchu/ANQ
oroesa/AMNQ
gamsillafu/ANQ
clafychu/ALNQ
dempru/ANQ
ymorchestu/ANQ
ganwyra/ANQ
flasi/ADNQ
heheda/ANQ
ddistylli/ADNQ
graeanu/ANQ
lluniada/ANQ
briodola/ANQ
ragddywedyd/A
cydbwrcasu/ALNQ
dirweddu/ANQ
pensyfrdanu/ALNQ
hwpi/ADNQ
rhasglu/ANQ
creisiona/ALNQ
hefengyla/ANQ
gydlynu/ANQ
nythu/ANQ
creulona/ALNQ
goleddu/ANQ
lychwina/ANQ
proffesu/ALNQ
meithrina/ANQ
ddiswydda/ANQ
hwyneblasa/ANQ
gefnu/ANQ
adu/ANQ
bastynu/ANQ
ymgoda/ANQ
fywioga/ANQ
benthyci/ADNQ
wrthddadleua/AMNQ
hywedda/ANQ
ymneilltua/ANQ
nefola/ANQ
ymresymu/ANQ
geula/ANQ
lafargana/ANQ
hail-letwadu/ANQ
cydymdrafoda/ALNQ
dygnu/ABNQ
dyrchu/ANQ
dihatryd/A
weryra/AMNQ
archwaethu/ANQ
wrthddyweda/AMNQ
garchara/ANQ
dadyrddu/ANQ
rhytha/ANQ
bothellu/ANQ
tywarchu/ALNQ
cyd-drafoda/ALNQ
ymlawenycha/ANQ
wyntylli/ADMNQ
clebra/ALNQ
glafychu/ANQ
adwya/ANPQ
gami/AN
warafuna/AMNQ
ffroena/ANQ
chwanta/ANQ
hallanadlu/ANQ
hymddyfalu/ANQ
beua/ANQ
telegynhadledda/ALNQ
ddichellu/ANQ
lloga/ANQ
gyffwrdda/ANQ
achlesa/ANPQ
omedda/AMNQ
grisialu/ANQ
atgoffi/ANPQ
ysgafna/ANQ
ymdrecha/ANQ
colura/ALNQ
daroganu/ANQ
gorthrymu/ANQ
Cynana/ALNQ
disgyrcha/ANQ
ddathla/ANQ
deddfa/ANQ
pistyllu/ALNQ
lechi/ADN
gyfantola/ANQ
camweddu/ALNQ
claeara/ALNQ
fenthyci/ADNQ
hymddiosga/ANQ
amlosga/ANPQ
cyflymu/ALNQ
pwdu/ALNQ
partha/ALNQ
ddichlyna/ANQ
debygu/ANQ
camgolledu/ALNQ
hymddyrchafa/ANQ
terfysgu/ALNQ
traeanu/ALNQ
gynghora/ANQ
mawrygu/ANQ
hunola/ANQ
mydylu/ANQ
lewyga/ANQ
orgynrychiola/AMNQ
gymuda/ANQ
ddanfona/ANQ
cydladda/ALNQ
hymddiala/ANQ
hadferu/ANQ
petrusa/ALNQ
llygada/ANQ
hyslotiana/ANQ
ailetha/ANPQ
pregethu/ALNQ
fachi/ADNQ
wylltu/ANQ
sibrwda/ANQ
daenella/ANQ
hymgysylltu/ANQ
hymgynefina/ANQ
ymgynefina/ANQ
dihydrada/ANQ
rydu/AMNQ
ailflagura/ANPQ
draeana/ANQ
strwythura/ANQ
ailstrwythura/ANPQ
hailddysgu/ANQ
gamgolleda/ANQ
boena/ANQ
hynfyda/ANQ
gweithredu/ANQ
chwyrnella/ANQ
llifi/ADNQ
farchi/ADNQ
sawri/ADNQ
blysu/ANQ
cwestiyna/ALNQ
gyfamoda/ANQ
bradychu/ANQ
gydaddysga/ANQ
ymgodyma/ANQ
ailddatganu/ANQ
cartha/ALNQ
rua/ANQ
ddwyshaeru/ANQ
dinoetha/ANQ
blanta/ANQ
hailgasglu/ANQ
cledra/ALNQ
egniola/ANQ
ddarogana/ANQ
lindaga/ANQ
megina/ANQ
dalu/ANQ
wyneblasa/ANQ
hymlawenycha/ANQ
frywedda/ANQ
ddiesgyrna/ANQ
cofweina/ALNQ
raeana/ANQ
hyfrydu/ANQ
bererindota/ANQ
ffrewyllu/ANQ
ffola/ANQ
drwblu/ANQ
ailgysga/ANPQ
hymbrofa/ANQ
pyngada/ALNQ
gypla/ANQ
ansefydla/ANPQ
haenella/ANQ
betrusa/ANQ
fargoda/ANQ
oleddu/ANQ
fygu/ANQ
gyflyru/ANQ
camgyfrifa/ALNQ
ddysgu/ANQ
ymgythrudda/ANQ
dylina/ANQ
ymgwympa/ANQ
sioma/ANQ
cami/ALN
llwydda/ANQ
gancra/ANQ
clustnoda/ALNQ
tolacha/ALNQ
dedfrydu/ANQ
gaglu/ANQ
gystadla/ANQ
trwbla/ALNQ
papura/ALNQ
aflonyddu/ANQ
fatinga/ANQ
anghysura/ANPQ
lledwyra/ANQ
rychu/AMNQ
ddyblygu/ANQ
llynca/ANQ
hochrgamu/ANQ
hymesgusoda/ANQ
tra-arglwyddiaetha/ALNQ
lwgu/ANQ
hysgaldanu/ANQ
fustachu/ANQ
ddominyddu/ANQ
datgyffesa/ANQ
dansodda/ANQ
dygo/ABNQ
biba/ANQ
sarna/ANQ
cywira/ALNQ
cyfanhedda/ALNQ
ymaddasa/ANQ
gamatala/ANQ
aberthu/ANQ
wystna/AMNQ
pererina/ALNQ
sychdartha/ANQ
meistrola/ANQ
trawswyra/ALNQ
ddisgyrcha/ANQ
ddedfryda/ANQ
